Utah statutes.
32B-16-302.   Action for contribution.

(1) (a)  Subject to Subsections (2) and (3), a minor liable under Section 32B-16-201 against whom an award is made under this chapter, may bring a separate cause of action for contribution against a person causing the liability under Section 32B-16-201.

(b)  The maximum amount for which a person described in Subsection (1)(a) may be liable to a minor seeking contribution is that percentage or proportion of the amount described in Section 32B-16-201 equivalent to the percentage or proportion of fault attributed to that person causing the liability under Section 32B-16-201.

(2)  An action for contribution under this section may not be brought against:

(a)  the retail licensee to whom the minor is liable; or

(b)  staff of the retail licensee.

(3)  An action for contribution under this section may not diminish the amount collected by a retail licensee under this chapter.

